th: ประเภทการติดตั้งซับวูฟเฟอร์: แบบตู้ / มีกล่องหุ้ม; แบบแขวนลอย / อินฟินิทบัฟเฟิล; แบบใส่แทนยางอะไหล่; แบบวางใต้เบาะ; แบบตู้สำเร็จรูปเฉพาะรุ่นรถ; อื่นๆ
fi: Subwooferin asennustyyppi: Koteloitu; Free-air / infinite baffle; Vararengaskotelo subwooferille; Istuimen alle asennettava subwoofer; Ajoneuvokohtainen valmiskotelo; Muu
ro-RO: Tip de instalare a subwooferului: Incintă / cutie; Free-air / panou infinit; Incintă de subwoofer pentru roata de rezervă; Subwoofer sub scaun; Incintă prefabricată specifică vehiculului; Altele
ko: 서브우퍼 설치 유형: 인클로저/박스형; 프리에어/무한 배플; 스페어 타이어 서브우퍼 인클로저; 언더시트 서브우퍼; 차량 맞춤형 조립식 인클로저; 기타
sk-SK: Typ inštalácie subwoofera: V ozvučnici / v boxe; Free-air / nekonečná ozvučnica; Ozvučnica subwoofera do rezervy; Subwoofer pod sedadlo; Prefabrikovaná ozvučnica pre konkrétne vozidlo; Iné
fr: Type d’installation du caisson de basses: Caisson / Boîte; Free-air / Baffle infini; Caisson de basse pour roue de secours; Caisson de basse sous le siège; Caisson préfabriqué spécifique au véhicule; Autre
nb: Subwoofer-installasjonstype: Kabinett / kasse; Free-air / uendelig baffel; Subwoofer-kasse for reservehjulsbrønn; Subwoofer under setet; Kjøretøyspesifikk prefabrikkert kasse; Annet
es: Tipo de instalación del subwoofer: Caja o cajón; Aire libre o bafle infinito; Caja de subwoofer para rueda de repuesto; Subwoofer debajo del asiento; Caja prefabricada específica para el vehículo; Otro
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης υπογούφερ: Σε καμπίνα / κουτί; Free-air / άπειρης οθόνης; Καμπίνα subwoofer για ρεζέρβα; Subwoofer κάτω από το κάθισμα; Προκατασκευασμένη καμπίνα ανά όχημα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Alto-falante de graves tipo de instalação: Caixa acústica; Free-air/Baffle infinito; Caixa de subwoofer para estepe; Subwoofer para baixo do banco; Caixa pré-fabricada específica do veículo; Outros
zh-CN: 低音炮安装类型: 箱式; 自由空气/无限障板; 备胎低音炮箱体; 座位下低音炮; 专车专用预制箱体; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta ugradnje subwoofera: U kutiji / kućištu; Free-air / otvoreno; Kućište u rezervnoj gumi; Subwoofer ispod sjedala; Tvorničko kućište prilagođeno vozilu; Ostalo
de: Einbauart des Subwoofers: Gehäuse / Box; Free-Air / Infinite Baffle; Reserverad-Subwoofergehäuse; Untersitz-Subwoofer; Fahrzeugspezifisches Fertiggehäuse; Sonstige
vi: Loại lắp đặt loa siêu trầm: Có vỏ/hộp; Lắp tự do/Vách ngăn vô hạn; Hộp loa siêu trầm ở lốp dự phòng; Loa siêu trầm dưới gầm ghế; Vỏ chế tạo sẵn theo loại xe; Khác
tr: Subwoofer montaj tipi: Kabin / kutulu; Serbest hava / sonsuz sönümleyici (baffle); Yedek lastik subwoofer kabini; Koltuk altı subwoofer; Araca özel prefabrik kabin; Diğer
sv: Subwooferinstallationstyp: Kapsling / i låda; Free-air / oändlig baffel; Subwooferlåda för reservdäck; Subwoofer under sätet; Fordonsspecifik prefabricerad låda; Övrigt
ja: サブウーファー設置タイプ: エンクロージャー / ボックス; フリーエア / インフィニットバッフル; スペアタイヤ用サブウーファーエンクロージャー; シート下サブウーファー; 車種専用プレハブエンクロージャー; その他
ru: Тип установки сабвуфера: В корпусе / закрытый; Открытый (free-air) / бесконечный экран; В нишу запасного колеса; Под сиденье; Штатный корпус под конкретный автомобиль; Другое
it: Tipo di installazione del subwoofer: Cassa / In box; Aria libera / Schermo acustico infinito; Cassa per subwoofer per ruota di scorta; Subwoofer sottosedile; Cassa prefabbricata specifica per veicolo; Altro
nl: Subwoofer installatietype: Behuizing / kist; Free-air / infinite baffle; Subwooferbehuizing reservewiel; Subwoofer onder stoel; Voertuigspecifieke prefab-behuizing; Overig
da: Installationstype for subwoofer: Kabinet / boks; Free-air / uendelig baffel; Subwoofer-kabinet til reservehjul; Subwoofer til under sædet; Køretøjsspecifikt præfabrikeret kabinet; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação do subwoofer: Caixa/compartimento; Free-air/baffle infinito; Caixa para subwoofer no pneu suplente; Subwoofer por baixo do assento; Caixa pré-fabricada específica para o veículo; Outro
cs: Typ instalace subwooferu: V ozvučnici / boxu; Bez ozvučnice (free-air); Do rezervního kola; Pod sedadlo; Typizovaná ozvučnice pro konkrétní vozidlo; Jiné
pl: Typ montażu subwoofera: W obudowie / w skrzyni; Free-air / odgroda nieskończona; Obudowa do koła zapasowego; Pod fotel; Prefabrykowana, dedykowana do modelu; Inny
zh-TW: 重低音喇叭安裝類型: 音箱/箱體式; 開放式/無限障板; 備胎式重低音音箱; 座椅下重低音; 車型專用預製音箱; 其他
en: Subwoofer installation type: Enclosure / boxed; Free-air / infinite baffle; Spare-tire subwoofer enclosure; Under-seat subwoofer; Vehicle-specific prefab enclosure; Other
lt-LT: Žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbio montavimo tipas: Korpusiniai / dėžėje; Atvirojo tipo (Free-air) / begalinio ekrano; Atsarginio rato korpusas; Po sėdyne montuojamas žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbis; Konkrečiam automobiliui pritaikytas korpusas; Kitas
hu: Mélynyomó-beépítés típusa: Zárt / dobozos; Free-air / infinite baffle; Pótkerék-mélynyomó doboz; Ülés alatti mélynyomó; Járműspecifikus előre gyártott doboz; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на субуфера: Кутия / корпусен; Свободен обем / безкраен екран; Кутия за резервната гума; Субуфер под седалката; Фабрична кутия за конкретен автомобил; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve nizkotonskega zvočnika: V ohišju / škatli; Odprto (free-air) / neskončna pregrada; Ohišje v prostoru za rezervno kolo; Nizkotonec pod sedežem; Predizdelano ohišje za specifična vozila; Drugo